Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 3. Executive
Executive Order No. 3-84
(No. 19-17) [Executive Code of Ethics.

WHEREAS, throughout the state, dedicated public servants bring their talents and expertise to work on behalf of all Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, it is essential to the proper operation of government that public officers be principled and impartial; that governmental decisions and policy be made fairly and impartially on the merits of the matter at issue; that public office not be used
for private gain other than the remuneration provided by law; and that there be public confidence in the integrity of government; and

WHEREAS, there is a risk that the attainment of one or more of these ends may be impaired whenever a conflict exists between the private interests of a public officer and his or her official responsibilities; and

WHEREAS, it is also essential to the proper operation of government that those best qualified not be discouraged from serving as public officers by requiring them to relinquish totally the opportunity to further their interests, at least where such interests
do not create irreconcilable conflicts with their official responsibilities; and

WHEREAS, both the public and private sectors of Vermont are enriched by the healthy exchange of individuals who have hands-on knowledge and work experience in both the public and private sectors; and

WHEREAS, an Executive Code of Ethics effectively ensures fairness and impartiality in the conduct of State business, while at the same time encouraging the recruitment and retention of those best qualified to serve the State and ought to be reaffirmed
and continued.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby promulgate the following Executive Code of Ethics:

Except where otherwise provided by law, all Appointees (as defined herein) shall be subject to provisions of this Executive Order. Nothing in this Executive Order shall exempt an Appointee from any other requirement of law or any duly adopted State personnel
policy.

To assure adherence to this Code, all future Appointees, and any current Appointees who have not signed an acknowledgment with respect to Executive Order No. 09-11 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-53), will be asked to sign the acknowledgment attached
hereto as Exhibit A and submit it to the Secretary. The Secretary shall have the authority to interpret the provisions of this Code as they relate to circumstances and to issue exemptions from this Code under special circumstances.
All such interpretations and exemptions shall be written and kept by the Secretary in the same manner as the Conflict Questionnaires.

Definitions.

As used in this Executive Order:

“Appointee” means any member of a Public Body appointed by or upon the approval of the Governor, including Executive Officers, or any exempt employee appointed by or upon the approval of such an Appointee.

“Appearance of a Conflict of Interest” means the impression that a reasonable person might have, after full disclosure of the facts, that an Appointee’s judgment might be significantly influenced by outside interests, even though there may be no actual
Conflict of Interest.

“Conflict of Interest” means a significant interest of an Appointee or such an interest, known to the Appointee, of a member of his or her immediate family or household, or of a business associate, in the outcome of a particular matter pending before
the Appointee or his or her Public Body. ‘Conflict of Interest‘ does not include any interest that (i) is no greater than that of other persons generally affected by the outcome of a matter (such as a policyholder in an insurance
company or a depositor in a bank), or (ii) has been disclosed to the Secretary and found not to be significant.

“Executive Officer” means an agency secretary or deputy or a department commissioner or deputy.

“Full-time appointee” means any appointee receiving a full-time salary for State service.

“Private Entity” is any person, corporation, partnership, joint venture or association, whether organized for profit or not for profit, except those specifically chartered by the State of Vermont or which relies upon taxes for at least fifty percent (50%)
of its revenues.

“Public Body” means any State agency, department, division or office and any board or commission of any such entity or any independent board or commission in the executive branch of the State.

“Secretary” shall, unless otherwise specified, mean the Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs.

General Conduct.

An Appointee must conduct the affairs of their office in such a manner as to instill public trust and confidence in the integrity of State government. Further, Appointees have a responsibility to act as examples and set a civil and respectful tone in
the public discourse.

A.
Thus, an Appointee shall always, and without exception, be honest, helpful and fully committed to the principle that all authority is derived from the people, and therefore, all officers of government, whether
legislative or executive, are servants of the people and at all times, in a legal way, accountable to them. [VT. Const., Ch I, Article 6]

B.
Appointees shall take all reasonable steps to avoid any action or circumstances, including acts or circumstances which may not be specifically prohibited by this Code, which might result in:

Personal Interests, Outside Employment and Financial Activities.

Reports.

A.
Appointees

Within thirty days of appointment and thereafter annually on June 30, every Appointee who earns $30,000 or more per year shall file with the Secretary an ‘Ethics Questionnaire‘ as prescribed in Exhibit B. These questionnaires shall be treated as confidential
personnel documents as defined by 1 VSA § 317(b)(7) and kept as such during the gubernatorial administration in which the Appointee serves, or for one year after the Appointee leaves office, whichever occurs first, at which
point they will be destroyed.

B
Executive Officers (

3 V.S.A. § 1211
)

In addition, if an Executive Officer’s spouse or domestic partner is a lobbyist as defined in 2 V.S.A. § 261, the Executive Officer shall disclose that fact and provide the name of his or her spouse or domestic partner and, if applicable, the name of
his or her lobbying firm.

An Executive Officer shall file his or her disclosure with the Ethics Commission on or before January 15 of the odd-numbered year or, if he or she is appointed after January 15, within 10 days after that appointment.

Enforcement.

The purpose of this Executive Code of Ethics is to provide guidance to Appointees covered herein. During such appointment, except as otherwise required by law, only the Governor or his designated agent shall have the power to sanction any violations hereof.
Nothing in this Code shall create a right to continue State employment. The remedy for a violation of post-employment restrictions set forth in Section III(B) shall rest with the Public Body before which the former Appointee
appears and, barring unusual circumstances, shall result only in disqualifying the former Appointee from appearing or participating in the matter.

Effective Date.

Except as otherwise required by law, this Executive Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order No. 09-11 (codified as No. 3-53), dated July 21, 2011. This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated December 4, 2017.

Click to view

Undermining his or her independence or impartiality or action;

Taking official action based on unfair considerations;

Giving preferential treatment to any private interest or Private Entity based on unfair considerations;

Giving preferential treatment to any family member or member of the Appointee’s household;

(6)
Using public office to secure special privileges or exemptions;

(7)
Adversely affecting the confidence of the public in the integrity of state government.

(8)
Undermining the climate of civility and respect required for every open, democratic government to thrive.

C.
Every appointee shall be true and faithful to the State of Vermont and will not, directly or indirectly, do any act or thing injurious to the Constitution or Government of the State of Vermont. Every Appointee
will faithfully execute the office which he or she holds and will therein do equal right and justice to all men and women, to the best of his or her judgment and ability, according to law. [VT. Const., Ch II, Section 56]

D.
Appointees shall always treat each other, employees, staff, volunteers and the public with dignity, respect, empathy and courtesy.

E.
Appointees shall support efforts to create and maintain a diverse and effective work force.

F.
Appointees shall promote a workplace that is free from sexual harassment, or inappropriate personal relationships, and shall take quick and effective action to ensure that sexual harassment does not occur or persist.

G.
Every Full-Time Appointee shall devote his or her worktime to the duties of his or her office.

H.
An Appointee shall not use State property nor permit others to use State property unless the use is reasonably related to his or her official responsibilities or the conduct is permitted pursuant to a duly adopted
State or agency personnel policy.

I.
An Appointee shall not enter into any commitment to expend State funds unless the expenditure is reasonable and valuable to the State and made in accordance with all applicable statutes, rules, directives or Bulletins
from the Secretary of the Agency of Administration.

J.
An Appointee shall be in good standing with respect to, or in full compliance with a plan to pay, all taxes due the United States, the State of Vermont and the municipality of residence. An Appointee shall be in
good standing with respect to, or in full compliance with a plan to pay, all child support obligations.

K.
All Full-Time Appointees shall attend State-sponsored training on issues related to sexual harassment and governmental ethics at least annually.

Using public office for the advancement of personal interest;

Exemptions sought under this Code shall be issued only to further the twin goals of this Code: 1) to establish high standards of ethical conduct for all Appointees and 2) to encourage those Vermonters best qualified to serve in State government.

A.

Ethical Rules While in State Employ:

(1)
No Full-Time Appointee shall be the owner of, or financially interested, directly or indirectly, in any Private Entity or private interest subject to the supervision of his or her respective Public Body, except
as a policy holder in an insurance company or a depositor in a bank (

3 V.S.A. § 204
). For this Executive Order, a direct or indirect financial interest excludes:

a.
any insignificant interest held individually or by a member of the Appointee’s immediate household or by a business associate, or

b.
any interest which is no greater than that of other persons who might be generally affected by the Supervision of the Appointee’s Public Body.

(2)
An appointee shall not take any action in any matter in which he or she has either a Conflict of Interest or the appearance of a Conflict of Interest, until Conflict is resolved.

(3)
An appointee shall not take any official action that materially advances the interest of any Private Entity with which the Appointee is actively seeking employment.

(4)
A full-time Appointee shall not, for pecuniary gain, be an advocate for any Private Entity in any matter before any Public Body or before the State General Assembly or its committees.

(5)
An appointee, while in State employ, shall not solicit or receive any payment, gift, or favor based on any understanding which may be reasonably implied by the Appointee or inferred by the donor, that it may influence
any official action.

An Appointee shall not solicit or receive any payment, gift or favor from any private interest or Private Entity which has, or seeks to obtain, contractual or other business or financial relationships with the Appointee’s Public Body; conducts business
or activities that are regulated by the Appointee’s Public Body; or has an interest that may be substantially affected by the Appointee’s official actions.

An Appointee, or his or her designee, shall not accept gifts or trips from private interests or Private Entities if the gifts or trips (i) are a quid pro quo; (ii) are intended to influence any decision by the Appointee; or (iii) create an appearance
of a Conflict of Interest.

Except in the event (i) a specific law, rule or regulation requires disclosure, or (ii) the State has entered into a confidentiality or non-disclosure agreement consistent with applicable State or federal law, regulation, rule or policy, an Appointee
shall not disclose to any Private Entity any confidential or privileged information obtained while in State employ.

An Appointee or his or her family shall not trade in stock or otherwise transact private business based upon information obtained by the Appointee through his or her work on behalf of the State.

It is the Governor’s expectation that Appointees will use State-provided equipment and official e-mail addresses for primarily State business purposes. Personal use shall be limited and must not: (i) interfere with normal business activities; or (ii)
be associated with any outside for-profit business activity of the Appointee.

Appointees are strongly encouraged to engage in electronic communications regarding official business only on their official email accounts. If private accounts must be used, Appointees shall copy their official e-mail accounts on all such outgoing communications
and forward any received messages on which their official emails are not copied. If substantive discussion (not otherwise documented) relating to the work of the Public Body occurs on a text-messaging system, such discussion is
to be copied to a separate public record format (such as by copying the relevant text messages to the appointee’s official e-mail).

Email messages and other electronic data produced or acquired in the course of the business of the Public Body is considered a public record subject to disclosure under the Vermont Public Records Act, regardless of whether the record resides in a State-provided
system or a private account; provided, however, solely for purposes of this subsection, “public body” does not include councils or similar groups established by the Governor for the sole purposes of advising the Governor with respect
to policies. Upon receipt of a records request, Appointees shall provide their Records Officers all responsive records in their own custody and control.

B.

Ethical Rules After State Employ:

(1)
For one year after leaving office, a former Appointee shall not, for pecuniary gain, be an advocate for any Private Entity before any Public Body or before the State General Assembly or its committees, regarding
any particular matter in which:

a.
the State is a party or has a direct and substantial interest; and

b.
the Appointee had participated personally and substantively while in State employ.

(2)
This prohibition applies to any matter the Appointee directly handled, supervised or managed, or gave substantial input, advice or comment, or benefited from, either through discussing, attending meetings on, or
reviewing materials prepared regarding the matter.

(3)
For one year after leaving office, a former Full-Time Appointee shall not, for pecuniary gain, be an advocate for any Private Entity before any Public Body or before the State General Assembly or its committees,
regarding any particular matter in which the Full-Time Appointee had exercised any official responsibility.

(4)
Subject to exemptions set forth in 2 V.S.A. § 262, for one year after leaving office, an Executive Officer, shall not be a lobbyist (as defined in

2 V.S.A. § 261
), in this State.

In addition to the reporting required in Section IV(A) above, pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 1211
, each Executive Officer shall biennially file with the State Ethics Commission a disclosure form that contains the following information in regard to the previous calendar year:

(1)
Each source, but not amount, of personal income of the Executive Officer and of his or her spouse or domestic partner, and of the Executive Officer together with his or her spouse or domestic partner, that totals
more than $5,000.00, including any of the sources meeting that total described as follows:

a.
employment, including the employer or business name and address and, if self-employed, a description of the nature of the self-employment without needing to disclose any individual clients; and

b.
investments, described as “investment income.”

(2)
Any board, commission, or other entity that is regulated by law or that receives funding from the State on which the Executive Officer served and the Executive Officer’s position on that entity.

(3)
Any company of which the Executive Officer or his or her spouse or domestic partner, or the Executive Officer together with his or her spouse or domestic partner, owned more than 10 percent.

(4)
Any lease or contract with the State held or entered into by:

a.
the Executive Officer or his or her spouse or domestic partner; or

b.
a company of which the Executive Officer or his or her spouse or domestic partner, or the officer together with his or her spouse or domestic partner, owned more than 10 percent.

CODE OF ETHICS ACKNOWLEDGEMENT I, , having been appointed to the position of , hereby acknowledge having received and read Executive Order 19-17, the Executive Code of Ethics, promulgated on December 4, 2017, and agree to adhere to it. Signature: Date:
Name (print): OATH OF OFFICE I, , do solemnly swear/affirm that I will be true and faithful to the State of Vermont, and that I will not, directly or indirectly, do any act or thing injurious to the Constitution or Government thereof.
So help me God. / Under the pains and penalties of perjury. I , do solemnly swear/affirm that I will faithfully execute the Office of , for the State of Vermont, and that I will therein do equal right and justice to all persons, to
the best of my judgment and ability according to law. So help me God. / Under the pains and penalties of perjury. I , do solemnly swear/affirm that I will support the Constitution of the United States. So help me God. / Under the pains
and penalties of perjury. Signature: STATE OF VERMONT COUNTY, SS At , in said County, this day of , 2017, personally appeared and took and subscribed the foregoing oath of office and allegiance. Before Me, Notary Public My Commission
expires EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 19-17 EXHIBIT B ETHICS QUESTIONNAIRE In accordance with the Executive Order No. 19-17 Executive Code of Ethics, every Appointee, as defined therein, who earns $30,000 or more per year, shall fill out and
file this questionnaire annually, on or by June 30, with the Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs. This questionnaire shall be treated as a confidential personnel document pursuant to and kept as such during the gubernatorial administration
in which the Appointee serves, or for one year after the Appointee leaves office, whichever occurs first.

1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(7)
The purpose of this questionnaire is to determine any significant personal interests of Appointees that might conflict with the best interests of the state. It is understood that individuals serving the state as Appointees
may have pecuniary interests that may relate to matters arising in the course of their performance of the official responsibilities. This form is intended to identify those interests and provide assurance that conflicts of interest
will not impair fair and impartial state actions. Appointees must avoid Conflicts of Interest and, where they do occur, must disclose them to the Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs. In answering questions, please disclose not
only your own direct interests but also any indirect or beneficial interests which could arise through members of your immediate family (spouses, dependent children) or through persons who reside in your home or by reason of a trust
or partnership arrangement in which you or a member of your immediate family or household participates or has an interest. (Use reverse side or an additional sheet or paper to give additional information, if necessary.) 1. Are you,
your spouse, or a member of your immediate family the director, officer, partner or employee of any enterprise that, to your knowledge, does business or has a financial relationship with the State of Vermont? If yes, please list all
such positions. Yes No 2. To the best of your knowledge, except for securities that are listed on a national exchange, do you own directly, indirectly, or beneficially, securities, options, or rights to purchase securities or share
in profits of companies doing business with the State? If yes, list company and percent of total shares. Yes No 3. Do you directly, indirectly or beneficially, have any ownership interest in a proprietorship, partnership, or syndicate
that, to your knowledge, operates any business which does business with the State? If yes, explain briefly. Yes No 4. To the best of your knowledge, does there currently exist any creditor-debtor relationship between you, directly
or indirectly, and any non-financial organization doing business with the State, except normal charge accounts and installment purchase accounts? If yes, explain briefly. Yes No 5. Are you receiving commissions or any forms of compensation,
gift or reward on business transacted with the State either directly or through a third person? If yes, explain briefly. Yes No 6. In addition to the information reported above, do you have any direct or indirect business relationships
which may reasonably be considered to have some influence on your judgment and decisions involving transactions with the State, or otherwise during the performance of your duties and responsibilities as a Appointee? If yes, explain
briefly. Yes No 7. Are you in good standing with respect to, or in full compliance with a plan to pay, any and all taxes due the State of Vermont, the State of Vermont and the municipality of residence? If no, explain. Yes No 8. If
you are under an obligation to pay child support, are you in good standing with respect to that obligation? Yes No If no, have you entered into a payment plan with the Vermont Office of Child Support and are you in full compliance
with that payment plan? Yes No 9. I agree to disassociate myself from situations where possible conflicts of interest pertaining to any matter addressed in this questionnaire might occur, when requested by the Governor or his or her
representative, the Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs. 10. To the best of my knowledge, the answers to all of the above questions are true and complete in every respect. Signed Date: Name (printed): Position:

Executive Order No. 3-85
(No. 06-17) [Creation of the Agency of Digital Services.

WHEREAS, the Governor, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. Section 2001, may make such changes in the organization of the executive branch or in the assignment of functions among its units as he considers necessary for efficient administration; and

WHEREAS, it is desirable to reorganize the departments and divisions of government by better coordinating certain activities and to improve the coordination and effectiveness of services to the public; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Information and Innovation and various State agencies purchase information technology (IT) products and services, administer IT programs and provide IT services; and

WHEREAS, the existing structure of centralized IT and decentralized IT operating in parallel has made it difficult to (i) share data; (ii) capture comprehensive IT usage metrics, including spending; (iii) develop a comprehensive strategy for funding,
procurement and use of IT; (iv) ensure results based accountability; and (v) collaborate on statewide best practices; and

WHEREAS, many states have restructured information technology governance in order to increase efficiency, broaden transparency and enable more strategic use of IT; and

WHEREAS, restructuring IT governance presents an opportunity to better align business functions and IT through:

Improved coordination of technology procurements;

Improved project management practices and standards;

Improved communication among State agency and department technology resources;

Improved IT governance;

Utilization of technology skills and resources across departments for the benefit of all agencies and departments;

A comprehensive understanding of IT spending;

Support of results based accountability;

Realignment of IT resources with State priorities; and

WHEREAS, this restructuring offers benefits to State employees through greater opportunities for professional development within State government; and

WHEREAS, the State could improve and more efficiently deliver services to the public through the creation of the Agency of Digital Services.

NOW, THEREFORE, by virtue of the authority vested in me by 3 V.S.A. Chapter 41 as Governor, I, Philip B. Scott, do hereby create an Agency of Digital Services. The Agency of Digital Services shall be the successor to, and the continuation of, the Department
of Information and Innovation.

All duties, obligations, responsibilities and authority, including all contracts, grant agreements, service level agreements and MOUs of the Department of Information and Innovation are hereby transferred to the Agency of Digital Services and shall continue
in force and effect without any interruption in their functions.

All financial assets and liabilities of the Department of Information and Innovation are hereby transferred to the Agency of Digital Services and shall be accounted for in the Internal Services Fund, known as the Communications and Information Technology
Fund.

The position of the Commissioner of the Department of Information and Innovation is abolished and all the duties, responsibilities and authority of the Commissioner are hereby transferred to the Secretary and Chief Information Officer of the Agency of
Digital Services.

All other authorized positions and equipment of the Department of Information and Innovation are transferred to the Agency of Digital Services.

Effective April 17, 2017, the Agency of Digital Services shall be headed by the Secretary and Chief Information Officer (together, the “CIO”) appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.

Effective April 17, 2017, the CIO of the Agency of Digital Services may appoint a Chief Financial Officer who shall be exempt from the classified service.

Effective April 17, 2017, the Agency of Digital Services shall consist of five divisions: (A) the Security Division which shall be headed by the Chief Information Security Officer appointed by the CIO of the Agency of Digital Services, with the approval
of the Governor; (B) the Enterprise Architecture Division which shall be headed by the Chief Technology Officer appointed by the CIO of the Agency of Digital Services, with the approval of the Governor; (C) the Data Management
Division which shall be headed by the Chief Data Officer appointed by the CIO of the Agency of Digital Services, with the approval of the Governor; (D) the Division of Enterprise Project Management; and (E) the Division of Shared
Services. The Division of Enterprise Project Management and the Division of Shared Services shall each be headed by a Director appointed by the CIO of the Agency of Digital Services, with the approval of the Governor. The Chief
Information Security Officer, the Chief Technology Officer, the Chief Data Officer and the Directors shall be exempt from the classified service.

Effective April 17, 2017, all existing department and agency technology leaders, including, but not limited to, chief information officers and directors of information technology (“technology leaders”), and their professional IT personnel in the Executive
Branch agencies and departments, shall report directly to the CIO of the Agency of Digital Services.

The Commissioner of the Department of Human Resources and the CIO of the Agency of Digital Services, in consultation with agency and department heads, shall identify technology leaders. The Commissioner of the Department of Human Resources and the CIO
of the Agency of Digital Services shall define the position duties and identify and determine appropriate classifications for all State personnel who perform information security activities, as that term is defined in

3 V.S.A. § 2222(9)
and information technology activities, as that term is defined in 3 V.S.A. 2222(10). All technology leaders shall be exempt from the classified service.

Beginning April 17, 2017, on an agency-by-agency and department-by-department basis, all positions and incumbents identified by the Commissioner of Human Resources and the CIO of the Agency of Digital Services as set forth above, shall transfer to the
Agency of Digital Services. Technology leaders and professional IT personnel shall remain in their current physical locations.

Beginning April 17, 2017, on an agency-by-agency and department-by-department basis, all appropriations associated with the positions transferred pursuant to paragraph 10 above, shall transfer from the affected agencies and departments to the Agency of
Digital Services.

Beginning April 17, 2017, on an agency-by-agency and department-by-department basis, all the functions, equipment, supplies and inventory associated with the positions transferred pursuant to paragraph 10 above, shall transfer from the affected agencies
and departments to the Agency of Digital Services. All agency and department contracts for goods and services shall remain with the respective agencies and departments.

The CIO of the Agency of Digital Services shall further study the effectiveness, priority and delivery of IT services and shall report to the Governor any additional recommendation for restructuring and/or statutory changes by November 17, 2017.

This Executive Order shall be submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
and shall take effect on April 17, 2017, unless disapproved by the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
(b)

.

Dated January 15, 2017.

Executive Order No. 3-86
(No. 02-18) [Internet Neutrality in State Procurement.

WHEREAS, Vermonters rely on open and unrestricted access to the value and economic opportunity the Internet offers; and

WHEREAS, Vermont’s educational institutions require a free and open Internet to educate students, promote social and intellectual growth, and to prepare them to succeed in the global economy; and

WHEREAS, Vermont’s school students rely on a free and open Internet to take full advantage of the vast amount of information, services, and communications opportunities available through online sources, and to develop into well-rounded citizens engaged
in the world beyond their geographic limits; and

WHEREAS, Vermont State employees use the Internet every day to serve citizens and conduct the business of the State; and

WHEREAS, throttling or paid prioritization of Internet services could adversely impact these institutions and the economic and social advancement of, and work for Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, many important and often critical government services are offered online to facilitate easy and efficient access by Vermonters, and throttling or paid prioritization of Internet services could limit Vermonters’ ready access to these services
and inhibit citizens, particularly those in need, from accessing important government services; and

WHEREAS, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) recently issued its order, “Restoring Internet Freedom” which eliminated net neutrality principles; and

WHEREAS, this Administration bears the ongoing responsibility of ensuring the efficient procurement of goods and services for State entities, and the principles of net neutrality are inherently tied to the provision of reliable, high-quality broadband
Internet service for the State.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby issue the following directive to all State Agencies, as follows:

All State Agency contracts with Internet service providers shall include net neutrality protections, and specifically state that Internet service providers shall not:

A.
Block lawful content, applications, services, or nonharmful devices, subject to reasonable network management that is disclosed to its customers;

B.
Throttle, impair or degrade lawful Internet traffic on the basis of Internet content, application, or service, or use of a nonharmful device, subject to reasonable network management that is disclosed to its customers;

C.
Engage in paid prioritization or providing preferential treatment of some Internet traffic to any Internet customer;

D.
Unreasonably interfere with or unreasonably disadvantage either:

i.
A customer’s ability to select, access, and use broadband Internet access service or the lawful Internet content, applications, services, or devices of their choice; or

ii.
An edge providers’ ability to make lawful content, applications, services, or devices available to a customer;

“State Agency” as used in this Executive Order shall include all State agencies, departments, commissions, committees, authorities, divisions, boards or other administrative units of the Executive Branch, including elected offices as well as those having
express statutory authority to enter into contracts (Agencies).

As soon as practicable, but in no event later than April 1, 2018, the Agency of Administration shall amend the State’s Procurement and Contracting Procedures as necessary and appropriate to comply with this directive.

Waivers to these Procedures may be granted by the Secretary only upon receipt of a written justification from a State Agency and a finding by the Secretary a waiver would serve a legitimate and significant interest of the State. The Department of Public
Service shall resolve any dispute over the definition of terminology used in this Executive Order.

Each State Agency that procures telecommunications services shall cooperate with the Agency of Administration and the Department of Buildings and General Services in implementing this Executive Order. State Agencies must receive approval from the Agency
of Digital Services and the Secretary of Administration before procuring Internet services, including cellular data and/or wireless broadband Internet services.

The Department of Public Service, in consultation with the Secretary of ADS, shall evaluate and advise the Governor on potential actions to promote net neutrality in order to protect Vermonters’ access to a free and open internet. This may include requiring
Internet service providers to provide notice to their customers regarding network and transport management practices and performance and commercial terms of their broadband Internet access services sufficient for (A) consumers
to make informed choices regarding use of such services and for content, application, service, and (B) device providers to develop, market, and maintain Internet offerings.

Nothing in this Order shall be construed to supersede any federal law.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated February 15 2018.